California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(e) The department, in consultation with the Chief Probation Officers of California and the counties, shall provide an interim report, pursuant to Section 9795 of the Government Code, to the Legislature no later than January 10, 2019, and a final report, pursuant to Section 9795 of the Government Code, to the Legislature no later than January 10, 2021, which shall include the number of youth served in home-based family care, in short-term residential therapeutic programs, and in group homes, characteristics of youth in these placement types, and whether there is a continued need for probation placement in group homes. The reports also shall provide recommendations on any further technical assistance and
 training, if needed, to facilitate county probation departments, county child welfare departments, DSS, and providers in strengthening the continuum of care for justice-involved youth.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 612, Sec. 95.   (AB 1997)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

11462.045.

(a) The State Department of Social Services shall establish a working group to develop recommended revisions to the current system of setting reimbursement rates for group home providers.

(b) In developing recommended revisions to the group home ratesetting system, the working group shall consider the larger context for how the system can better incorporate a spectrum of placements and services that
 promote positive outcomes for children and families and shall address all of the following:

(1) The provision of mental health and other critical services for children and youth.

(2) The provision of services in family-like settings.

(3) The provision of services that support families and relatives.

(4) Outcome-based evaluation or other quality improvement concepts.

(c) The working group shall include legislative policy and budget staff, stakeholders that are representative of foster youth, providers, children’s advocates, and county welfare and probation directors and staff.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 725, Sec. 19.   (AB 1612)   Effective October 19, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

11462.06.

(a) For purposes of the administration of this article, including the setting of AFDC-FC provider rates, the department shall deem the reasonable costs of leases for shelter care for foster children to be allowable costs. Reimbursement of shelter costs shall not exceed the fair market rental value, as determined in subdivision (b), of owned, leased, or rented buildings, including any structures, improvements, edifices, land, grounds, and other similar property that is owned, leased, or rented by the provider and that is used for the provider’s AFDC-FC programs and activities, exclusive of idle capacity and capacity used for nonresidential foster care programs and activities. Shelter costs shall be considered reasonable in relation to
 the fair market value limit as described in subdivision (b).

(b) (1) For purposes of this section, fair market rental value of leased property shall be determined by either of the following methods, as chosen by the provider:

(A) The fair market rental value determined by a comparative analysis prepared by an independent real estate broker. The comparative analysis shall be performed by a qualified, licensed professional who acts within the scope of the broker’s license, who, at a minimum, meets the standards for brokers, as specified in Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 2705) of Title 10 of the California Code of Regulations, and the comparatives shall be made in accordance with Section 200.465(a) of Title 2 of the Code of Federal Regulations. 

(B) The fair market rental value determined by an independent appraisal. The appraisal shall be performed by a qualified, licensed professional appraiser who, at a minimum, meets standards for appraisers as specified in Chapter 6.5 (commencing with Section 3500) of Title 10 of the California Code of Regulations.

 (2) The determinations made pursuant to this subdivision shall not be deemed independent if performed under a
 less-than-arm’s-length agreement, or if performed by a person or persons employed by, or under contract with, the program for purposes other than performing appraisals, or by a person having a material interest in any program that receives foster care payments. If the department believes an appraisal does not meet these standards, the department shall give its reasons in writing to the provider and provide an opportunity for appeal.

(c) Notwithstanding the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the department may implement applicable provisions of this section by all-county letters or similar instructions until regulations are adopted.

(d) (1) Commencing July 1, 2003, any group home or short-term residential therapeutic provider with a self-dealing lease transaction for shelter costs, as defined in Section 5233 of the Corporations Code, shall not be eligible for an AFDC-FC rate.

(2) Lease and rental transactions are subject to restrictions set forth in Section 200.465(c) of Title 2 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(e) (1) Fair market rental value shall be determined at the execution of the lease and at renewal or extension of the lease, or for a month-to-month tenancy, at the commencement of the audit period.

(2) Lease and rental arrangements shall be reviewed periodically to determine if circumstances have changed and
 other options are available.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 612, Sec. 96) by Stats. 2017, Ch. 732, Sec. 69.   (AB 404)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

11462.2.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 11462, when the director determines that a rate established pursuant to that section for a multistate group home facility which operates in more than two states and which provides high impact adventure programs and which first offered these programs in the State of Arizona, is less than the established national rate for the multistate group home facility, and when the director determines that the multistate group home facility is otherwise licensed but would not be available due to the operation of Section 11462, the director may at his or her discretion establish a rate comparable to the rate paid in
 other states.

(b) When the director establishes a rate pursuant to this section, the facility shall be subject to audits by the department, or other public or private audit agency with which the department contracts, no less often than every three years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1212, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

11462.4.

Notwithstanding Section 11342.610 of the Government Code, providers, as defined in Section 11466, shall be deemed small businesses and the department shall project the impact on group homes and foster family agencies of any new regulations which will affect those community care facilities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 732, Sec. 73.   (AB 404)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

11463.

(a) The department shall commence development of a new payment structure for the Title IV-E funded foster family agency placement option that maximizes federal funding, in consultation with county placing agencies.

(b) The department shall develop a payment system for foster family agencies that provide treatment, intensive treatment, and therapeutic foster care programs, and shall consider all of the following factors:

(1) Administrative activities that are eligible for federal financial participation provided, at the request of the county, for and to county-licensed or approved family homes and resource families, intensive case management and supervision, and services to achieve legal permanency
 or successful transition to adulthood.

(2) Social work activities that are eligible for federal financial participation under Title IV-E (42 U.S.C. Sec. 670 et seq.) of the federal Social Security Act.

(3) Social work and mental health services eligible for federal financial participation under Title XIX (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396 et seq.) of the federal Social Security Act.

(4) Intensive treatment or therapeutic services in the foster family agency.

(5) Core services that are made available to children and nonminor dependents either directly or secured through agreements with other agencies, and which are trauma informed, culturally relevant, and include any of the following:

(A) Specialty
 mental health services for children who meet medical necessity criteria for specialty mental health services, as provided for in Section 1830.205 or 1830.210 of Title 9 of the California Code of Regulations.

(B) Transition support services for children, youth, and families upon initial entry and placement changes and for families who assume permanency through reunification, adoption, or guardianship.

(C) Educational, physical, behavioral, and mental health supports, including extracurricular activities and social supports.

(D) Activities designed to support transition-age youth and nonminor dependents in achieving a successful adulthood.

(E) Services to achieve permanency, including supporting efforts to reunify or achieve adoption or guardianship and
 efforts to maintain or establish relationships with parents, siblings, extended family members, tribes, or others important to the child or youth, as appropriate.

(F) When serving Indian children, as defined in subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 224.1, the core services specified in subparagraphs (A) to (E), inclusive, shall be provided to eligible Indian children consistent with active efforts pursuant to Section 361.7.

(G) The core services specified in subparagraphs (A) to (F), inclusive, are not intended to duplicate services already available to foster children in the community, but to support access to those services and supports to the extent already available. Those services and supports may include, but are not limited to, foster youth services available through county offices of education, Indian Health Services, and school-based extracurricular activities.

(6) Staff training.

(7) Health and Safety Code requirements.

(8) A process for accreditation that includes all of the following:

(A) Provision for all licensed foster family agencies to maintain in good standing accreditation from a nationally recognized accreditation agency with expertise in programs for youth group care facilities, as determined by the department.

(B) Promulgation by the department of information identifying the agency or agencies from which accreditation shall be required.

(C) Provision for timely reporting to the department of any change in accreditation status.

(9) Mental health certification, including a requirement to timely report to the department any change in mental health certificate status.

(10) Populations served, including, but not limited to, any of the following:

(A) (i) Children and youth assessed as seriously emotionally disturbed, as described in subdivision (a) of Section 5600.3, including those children and youth placed out-of-home pursuant to an individualized education program developed under Article 2 (commencing with Section 56320) of Chapter 4 of Part 30 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Education Code.

(ii) Children assessed as meeting the medical necessity criteria for specialty mental health services, as provided for in Section 1830.205 or 1830.210 of Title 9 of the
 California Code of Regulations.

(B) AFDC-FC children and youth receiving intensive and therapeutic treatment services in a foster family agency.

(C) AFDC-FC children and youth receiving mental health treatment services from a foster family agency.

(11) Maximization of federal financial participation for Title IV-E (42 U.S.C. Sec. 670 et seq.) and Title XIX (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396 et. seq.) of the federal Social Security Act.

(c) Commencing January 1, 2017, the department shall establish rates pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b). The rate structure shall include an interim rate, a provisional rate for new foster family agency programs, and a probationary rate. The department may issue a one-time reimbursement for accreditation fees incurred after August 1,
 2016, in an amount and manner determined by the department in written directives.

(1) (A) Unless the Tiered Rate Structure established in subdivision (h) of Section 11461 applies to a child or nonminor dependent, initial interim rates developed pursuant to this section shall be effective January 1, 2017, to December 31, 2028, inclusive, or 24 months from the date required under paragraph (9) of subdivision (h) of Section 11461, whichever is later.

(B) The initial interim rates developed pursuant to this paragraph shall not be lower than the rates proposed as part of the Governor’s 2016 May Revision.

(C) The initial interim rates set forth in written directives or regulations pursuant to paragraph (4) shall become inoperative on January 1, 2029, or 24 months from the date required under paragraph (9) of subdivision (h) of Section 11461, whichever is later.

(2) Consistent with Section 11466.01, for provisional and probationary rates, all of the following shall be
 established:

(A) Terms and conditions, including the duration of the rate.

(B) An administrative review process for the rate determinations, including denials, reductions, and terminations.

(C) An administrative review process that includes a departmental review, corrective action, and an appeal with the department. Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), this process shall be disseminated by written directive pending the promulgation of regulations.

(3) (A) The
 foster family agency rate shall include a basic rate pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (g) of Section 11461. A child or youth placed in a certified family home or with a resource family of a foster family agency is eligible for the basic rate, which shall be passed on to the certified parent or resource family along with annual increases in accordance with paragraph (2) of subdivision (g) of Section 11461.

(B) The basic rate paid to either a certified family home or a resource family of a foster family agency shall be paid by the agency to the home from the rate that
 is paid to the agency pursuant to this section.

(C) In addition to the basic rate described in this paragraph, the department shall develop foster family agency rates that consider specialized programs to serve children with specific needs, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(i) Intensive treatment and behavioral needs, including those currently being served under intensive treatment foster care.

(ii) Specialized health care needs.

(4) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the foster family agency rates, and the manner in which they are determined, shall be set forth in written directives
 until regulations are adopted.

(d) The department shall develop a system of governmental monitoring and oversight that shall be carried out in coordination with the State Department of Health Care Services. Oversight responsibilities shall include, but not be limited to, ensuring conformity with federal and state law, including program, fiscal, and health and safety reviews. The state agencies shall attempt to minimize duplicative audits and reviews to reduce the administrative burden on providers.

(e) The department shall consider the impact on children and youth being transitioned to alternate programs as a result of the new ratesetting system.

(f) Commencing July 1, 2019, the rates paid to foster family agencies shall, except for the rate paid to a certified family home or resource family agency pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (c), be 4.15 percent higher than the rates paid to foster family agencies in the 2018–19 fiscal year.

(g) The amount included for the component for social workers in the interim rates for foster family agencies developed and implemented by the department pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) shall be increased over the rates paid to foster family agencies in the 2019–20 fiscal year by fifty dollars ($50) per child, per month, effective July 1, 2021.

(h) (1) Notwithstanding the rate established pursuant to subdivisions (a) to (g), inclusive, the care and supervision rate paid on behalf of a child or nonminor dependent in a foster family
 agency placement on or after the date required by paragraph (9) of subdivision (h) of Section 11461 shall be based on the Tiered Rate Structure established in subdivision (h) of Section 11461.

(2) Provided all federal and state rate and licensing requirements are met, the per child per month care and supervision rate, as set forth in paragraph (3) of subdivision (h) of Section 11461, for a child or nonminor dependent placed with a foster family agency shall include a rate, according to the child or nonminor dependent’s tier as determined by the child or nonminor dependent’s periodic IP-CANS assessment, for administrative and other activities described in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 11460, according to the following tiered schedule:

Tier 1: $1610

Tier 2: $2634

Tier 3: $2634 [Ages 0-5]

Tier 3+: $7213 [Ages 6+]

(3) The rate set forth in paragraph (2) beginning July 1, 2028, and each fiscal year thereafter, shall be annually adjusted on July 1 by the annual percentage change in the California Necessities Index applicable to the calendar year within which each July 1
 occurs.

(4) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this subdivision by means of all-county letters or similar written instructions, which shall be exempt from submission to or review by the Office of Administrative Law. These all-county letters or similar instructions shall have the same force and effect as regulations until the adoption of regulations no later than January 1, 2030.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 46, Sec. 31.   (AB 161)   Effective July 2, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

11463.5.

In order to receive funding on behalf of children receiving AFDC-FC, each provider, as defined in Section 11466, shall provide a full disclosure of all financial information related to its operation, including independent certification of the information provided, in a manner and format established by the department.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 732, Sec. 77.   (AB 404)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

11464.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) Children who are consumers of regional center services and also receiving Aid to Families with Dependent Children-Foster Care (AFDC-FC), Approved Relative Caregiver Funding Program (ARC) payments, Kinship Guardianship Assistance Payment (Kin-GAP) benefits, or Adoption Assistance Program (AAP) benefits have special needs that can require care and supervision beyond that typically provided to children in foster care. Clarifying the roles of the child welfare and developmental disabilities services systems will ensure that these children receive the services and supports they need in a timely manner and encourage the successful adoption of these children, where appropriate.

(2) To address the extraordinary care and supervision needs of children who are consumers of regional center services and also receiving AFDC-FC, ARC, Kin-GAP, or AAP benefits, it is necessary to provide a rate for care and supervision of these children that is higher than the average rate they would otherwise receive through the foster care system and higher than the rate other children with medical and other significant special needs receive.

(3) Despite the enhanced rate provided in this section, some children who are consumers of regional center services and also receiving AFDC-FC, ARC, Kin-GAP, or AAP benefits may have care and supervision needs that are so extraordinary that they cannot be addressed within that rate. In these limited circumstances, a process should be established whereby a supplement may be provided in addition to the enhanced rate.

(4) Children who receive rates pursuant to this section shall be afforded the same due process rights as all children who apply for AFDC-FC, ARC, Kin-GAP, and AAP benefits pursuant to Section 10950.

(b) Rates for children who are both regional center consumers and recipients of AFDC-FC, ARC, or Kin-GAP benefits under this chapter shall be determined as provided in Section 4684 and this section.

(c) (1) The rate to be paid for 24-hour out-of-home care and supervision provided to children who are both consumers of regional center services pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 4512 and recipients of AFDC-FC, ARC, or Kin-GAP benefits under this chapter shall be two thousand six dollars ($2,006) per child per month.

(2) (A) The county, at its sole discretion, may authorize a supplement of up to one thousand dollars ($1,000) to the rate for children three years of age and older, if it determines the child has the need for extraordinary care and supervision that cannot be met within the rate established pursuant to paragraph (1). The State Department of Social Services and the State Department of Developmental Services, in consultation with stakeholders representing county child welfare agencies, regional centers, and children who are both consumers of regional center services and recipients of AFDC-FC, ARC, Kin-GAP, or AAP benefits, shall develop objective criteria to be used by counties in determining eligibility for and the level of the supplements provided pursuant to this paragraph. The State Department of Social Services shall issue an all-county letter to implement these criteria within 120 days of the effective date of this act. The criteria shall take into account the extent to which the child has any of
 the following:

(i) Severe impairment in physical coordination and mobility.

(ii) Severe deficits in self-help skills.

(iii) Severely disruptive or self-injurious behavior.

(iv) A severe medical condition.

(B) The caregiver may request the supplement described in subparagraph (A) directly or upon referral by a regional center. Referral by a regional center shall not create the presumption of eligibility for the supplement.

(C) When assessing a request for the supplement, the county shall seek information from the consumer’s regional center to assist in the assessment. The county shall issue a determination of eligibility for
 the supplement within 90 days of receipt of the request. The county shall report to the State Department of Social Services the number and level of rate supplements issued pursuant to this paragraph.

(d) (1) The rate to be paid for 24-hour out-of-home care and supervision provided for children who are receiving services under the California Early Start Intervention Services Act, are not yet determined by their regional center to have a developmental disability, as defined in subdivisions (a) and (l) of Section 4512, and are receiving AFDC-FC, ARC, or Kin-GAP benefits under this chapter, shall be eight hundred ninety-eight dollars ($898) per child per month. If a regional center subsequently determines that the child is an individual with a developmental disability as that term is defined by subdivisions (a) and (l) of Section 4512, the rate to be paid from the date of that determination shall be consistent with subdivision
 (c).

(2) The rates to be paid for 24-hour out-of-home nonmedical care and supervision for children who are recipients of AFDC-FC, ARC, or Kin-GAP and consumers of regional center services from a community care facility licensed pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1500) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code and vendored by a regional center pursuant to Section 56004 of Title 17 of the California Code of Regulations, shall be the facility rate established by the State Department of Developmental Services.

(e) Rates paid pursuant to this section are subject to all of the following requirements:

(1) The rates paid to the foster care provider under subdivision (c) and paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) are only for the care and supervision of the child, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 11460 and
 shall not be applicable to facilities described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (d).

(2) Regional centers shall separately purchase or secure the services that are contained in the child’s Individualized Family Service Plan (IFSP) or Individual Program Plan (IPP), pursuant to Section 4684.

(3) Beginning with the 2011–12 fiscal year, the rates in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) and paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) shall be adjusted annually on July 1 by the percentage change in the California Necessities Index applicable to the calendar year within which each July 1 occurs. A county shall not be reimbursed for any increase in this rate that exceeds the adjustments made in accordance with this methodology.

(f) (1) The AFDC-FC rates paid on behalf of a regional center consumer who is a recipient of AFDC-FC prior to July 1, 2007, shall remain in effect unless a change in the placement warrants redetermination of the rate or if the child is no longer AFDC-FC eligible. However, AFDC-FC rates paid on behalf of these children that are lower than the rates specified in paragraph (1) of
 subdivision (c) or paragraph (1) of subdivision (d), respectively, shall be increased as appropriate to the amount set forth in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) or paragraph (1) of subdivision (d), effective July 1, 2007, and shall remain in effect unless a change in the placement or a change in AFDC-FC eligibility of the child warrants redetermination of the rate.

(2) For a child who is receiving AFDC-FC benefits or for whom a foster care eligibility determination is pending, and for whom an eligibility determination for regional center services pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 4512 is pending or approved, and for whom, prior to July 1, 2007, a State Department of Developmental Services facility rate determination request has been made and is pending, the rate shall be the State Department of Developmental Services facility rate determined by the regional center through an individualized assessment, or the rate established in paragraph
 (1) of subdivision (c), whichever is greater. The rate shall remain in effect until the child is no longer eligible to receive AFDC-FC, or, if still AFDC-FC eligible, is found ineligible for regional center services as an individual described in subdivision (a) of Section 4512. Other than the circumstances described in this section, regional centers shall not establish facility rates for AFDC-FC purposes.

(g) (1) The department shall adopt emergency regulations in accordance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and for the purposes of that chapter, including Section 11349.6 of the Government Code, on or before July 1, 2009.

(2) The adoption of regulations pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be deemed an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health,
 safety, and general welfare. The regulations authorized by this subdivision shall remain in effect for no more than 180 days, by which time final regulations shall be adopted.

(h) (1) The State Department of Social Services and the State Department of Developmental Services shall provide to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, on an annual basis, the data set forth in paragraph (2) to facilitate legislative review of the outcomes of the changes made by the addition of this section. The first report shall be submitted on October 1, 2007.

(2) The following data shall be provided pursuant to this subdivision:

(A) The number of, and services provided to, children who are consumers of regional center services and who are receiving AAP, ARC, Kin-GAP, or AFDC-FC, broken out by children receiving the
 amount pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (c), the amount pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (d), and the level of supplement pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (c).

(B) A comparison of services provided to these children and similar children who are regional center consumers who do not receive AFDC-FC, ARC, Kin-GAP, or AAP benefits, broken out by children receiving the amount pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (c), the amount pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (d), and the level of supplement pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (c).

(C) The number and nature of appeals filed regarding services provided or secured by regional centers for these children, consistent with Section 4714, broken out by children receiving the amount pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (c), the amount pursuant to paragraph (1)
 of subdivision (d), and the level of supplement pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (c).

(D) The number of these children who are adopted before and after the act adding this section, broken out by children receiving the amount pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (c), the amount pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (d), and the level of supplement pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (c).

(E) The number and levels of supplements requested pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (c).

(F) The number of appeals requested of the decision by counties to deny the request for the supplement pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (c).

(G) The total number and
 levels of supplements authorized pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) and the number of these supplements authorized upon appeal.

(i) The State Department of Social Services and the State Department of Developmental Services shall provide public transparency regarding implementation of this section through the annual posting of the data in paragraph (2) of subdivision (h) on their respective internet websites. Each department shall also maintain a link to the other department’s data on their respective internet websites.

(j) (1) Commencing January 1, 2012, and prior to July 1, 2017, the rate described in subdivision (c) shall be paid for an eligible nonminor dependent who is under 21 years of age, is receiving AFDC-FC or Kin-GAP benefits pursuant to Section 11403, and is a consumer of regional center services.

(2) Commencing July 1, 2017, the rate described in subdivision (c) shall be paid for an eligible nonminor dependent who is under 21 years of age, is receiving AFDC-FC, ARC, or Kin-GAP benefits pursuant to Section 11403, and is a consumer of regional center services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 46, Sec. 32.   (AB 161)   Effective July 2, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

11465.

(a) If a child is living with a parent who receives AFDC-FC or Kin-GAP benefits, or, on or after July 1, 2017, Approved Relative Caregiver Funding Program (ARC) payments, the rate paid to the provider on behalf of the parent shall include an amount for care and supervision of the child.

(b) For each category of eligible licensed community care facility, as defined in Section 1502 of the Health and Safety Code, the department shall adopt regulations setting forth a uniform rate to cover the cost of care and supervision of the child in each category of eligible licensed community care facility.

(c) (1) On and
 after July 1, 1998, the uniform rate to cover the cost of care and supervision of a child pursuant to this section shall be increased by 6 percent, rounded to the nearest dollar. The resultant amounts shall constitute the new uniform rate.

(2) (A) On and after July 1, 1999, the uniform rate to cover the cost of care and supervision of a child pursuant to this section shall be adjusted by an amount equal to the California Necessities Index computed pursuant to Section 11453, rounded to the nearest dollar. The resultant amounts shall constitute the new uniform rate, subject to further adjustment pursuant to subparagraph (B).

(B) In addition to the adjustment specified in subparagraph (A), on and after January 1, 2000, the uniform rate to cover the cost of care and
 supervision of a child pursuant to this section shall be increased by 2.36 percent, rounded to the nearest dollar. The resultant amounts shall constitute the new uniform rate.

(3) Subject to the availability of funds, for the 2000–01 fiscal year and annually thereafter, these rates shall be adjusted for cost of living pursuant to procedures in Section 11453.

(4) On and after January 1, 2008, the uniform rate to cover the cost of care and supervision of a child pursuant to this section shall be increased by 5 percent, rounded to the nearest dollar. The resulting amount shall constitute the new uniform rate.

(5) (A) Commencing July 1, 2016, the uniform rate to cover the cost of care and supervision of a child
 pursuant to this section shall be supplemented by an additional monthly amount of four hundred eighty-nine dollars ($489). This monthly supplement shall only be provided if funding for this purpose is appropriated in the annual Budget Act.

(B) Commencing July 1, 2026, the supplement described in subparagraph (A) shall be adjusted by an amount equal to the California Necessities Index computed pursuant to Section 11453.

(d) (1) (A) Prior to July 1, 2017, and notwithstanding subdivisions (a) to (c), inclusive, the payment made pursuant to this
 section for care and supervision of a child who is living with a teen parent in a whole family foster home, as defined in Section 11400, shall equal the basic rate for children placed in a licensed or approved home as specified in subdivisions (a) to (d), inclusive, and subdivision (g), of Section 11461.

(B) On or after July 1, 2017, the payment made for care and supervision of a child who is living with a teen parent in a whole family foster home shall be the uniform rate developed pursuant to subdivision (c).

(2) (A) The amount paid for care and supervision of a dependent infant living with a dependent teen parent receiving AFDC-FC benefits in a group home placement shall equal the infant supplement rate for group home placements.

(B) Commencing January 1, 2017, the amount paid for care and supervision of a dependent infant living with a dependent teen parent receiving AFDC-FC benefits in a short-term residential therapeutic program shall equal the infant supplement rate for short-term residential therapeutic programs established by the department.

(3) (A) The caregiver shall provide the county child welfare agency or probation department with a copy of the shared responsibility plan developed pursuant to Section 16501.25 and shall advise the county child welfare agency or probation department of any subsequent changes to the plan. Once the plan has been completed and provided to the appropriate agencies, the payment made pursuant to this section shall be increased by an additional
 two hundred dollars ($200) per month to reflect the increased care and supervision while the dependent teen parent is placed in the whole family foster home.

(B) A nonminor dependent parent residing in a supervised independent living placement, as defined in subdivision (w) of Section 11400, who develops a written parenting support plan pursuant to Section 16501.26 shall provide the county child welfare agency or probation department with a copy of the plan and shall advise the county child welfare agency or probation department of any subsequent changes to the plan. The payment made pursuant to this section shall be increased by an additional two hundred dollars ($200) per month after all of the following have been satisfied:

(i) The plan has been completed and provided to the
 appropriate county agency.

(ii) The plan has been approved by the appropriate county agency.

(iii) The county agency has determined that the identified responsible adult meets the criteria specified in Section 16501.27.

(4) In a year in which the payment provided pursuant to this section is adjusted for the cost of living as provided in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c), the payments provided for in this subdivision shall also be increased by the same procedures.

(5) A Kin-GAP relative who, immediately prior to entering the Kin-GAP program, was designated as a whole family foster home shall receive the same payment amounts for the care and supervision
 of a child who is living with a teen parent they received in foster care as a whole family foster home.

(6) (A) On and after January 1, 2012, and prior to July 1, 2017, the rate paid for a child living with a teen parent in a whole family foster home as defined in Section 11400 shall also be paid for a child living with a nonminor dependent parent who is eligible to receive AFDC-FC or Kin-GAP benefits pursuant to Section 11403.

(B) On and after July 1, 2017, the rate paid for a child living with a teen parent in a whole family foster home as defined in Section 11400 shall also be paid for a child living with a nonminor dependent parent who is eligible to receive AFDC-FC, ARC, or Kin-GAP benefits pursuant to Section 11403.

(e) (1) Commencing January 1, 2022, the rate paid for a pregnant minor or nonminor dependent for the three-month period immediately prior to the month in which the birth is anticipated shall include the amount that would otherwise be paid under this section to cover the care and supervision of a child, if born. Any amount paid pursuant to this subdivision shall be an expectant parent payment used to meet the specialized needs of the pregnant minor or nonminor dependent and to properly prepare for the needs of the infant.

(2) The department shall work with the County Welfare Directors Association of California and the California Statewide
 Automated Welfare System (CalSAWS) to develop and implement the necessary system changes to implement the expectant parent payment. The payment shall be automated on July 1, 2023, or when the department notifies the Legislature that CalSAWS can perform the necessary automation to implement it, whichever is later.

(3) Prior to the automation of the expectant parent payment in the CalSAWS system, counties shall issue a single payment in one lump sum for an expectant minor or nonminor dependent equal to three times the monthly amount paid pursuant to subdivision (a). The payment shall be issued in the month that is three months prior to the expected due date, or as soon as the county agency becomes aware of the pregnancy, and regardless of the date of entry into foster care or outcome of the pregnancy.

(4) The payment, or payments, made pursuant to this section shall not be prorated and overpayments shall not be established or collected.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 143, Sec. 1.   (AB 349)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

11465.6.
